Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 State Highway System

Cross references.

Control and regulation of outdoor advertising in relation to federal highways, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. II.

Law reviews.

For comment, “The Federal Highway Beautification Act After Metromedia,” see 35 Emory L.J. 419 (1986).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Granting, renewal, and revocation of permits for outdoor advertising, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-6.

Granting, renewal, and revocation of vegetation management permits for outdoor advertising, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-14.

32-6-70.
Declaration of policy.

The General Assembly declares it to be the policy of this state that the erection or maintenance of outdoor advertising in areas adjacent to the rights of way of roads of the state highway system, which roads are also a part of the interstate and primary systems of highways within the state, shall be regulated in accordance with the terms of this part and the regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant thereto and that all outdoor advertising which does not conform to the requirements of this part is a public nuisance. The General Assembly recognizes that the outdoor advertising industry is a bona fide commercial function. However, in no manner shall any outdoor advertising sign be defined as a commercial or industrial activity or be used for the purposes of administering this part. It is the intention of the General Assembly to provide a statutory basis for the regulation of outdoor advertising, such basis to be consistent with the public policy relating to areas adjacent to roads of the state highway system which also form a part of the interstate and primary systems of highways declared by the Congress in Title 23, Section 103, United States Code.

The General Assembly further declares it to be the policy of this state to avert substantial economic hardship by the retention, in specific areas defined by the board, upon request made by the Department of Transportation and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation, of directional signs, displays, and devices which were lawfully erected under state law in force at the time of their erection, which were in existence on May 5, 1976, and which do not conform to the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (5) of Code Section 32-6-72 and paragraphs (1) through (3) of Code Section 32-6-73, where it can be demonstrated that such signs, displays, and devices (1) provide directional information about goods and services in the specific interest of the traveling public and (2) are such that removal would work a substantial economic hardship in such defined area.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-913, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1086, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 32.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

For comment on State Hwy. Dep’t v. Branch,

222 Ga. 770

,

152 S.E.2d 372

(1966), discussing regulation of outdoor advertising and billboards as a constitutional “taking,” see 18 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (1967).

For note, “Regulation and Ownership of the Marshlands: The Georgia Marshlands Act,” see 5 Ga. L. Rev. 563 (1971).

For annual survey on business corporations, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 61 (2012).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2018).

32-6-71.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Defined area” means any area or areas within the state defined by the board, upon request made by the State Department of Transportation and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation, to be an area where the removal of directional signs, displays, and devices which were lawfully erected under state law in force at the time of their erection, which were in existence on May 5, 1976, and which do not conform to the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (5) of Code Section 32-6-72 and paragraphs (1) through (3) of Code Section 32-6-73 would deprive the traveling public of directional information about goods and services in the specific interest of the traveling public and would work a substantial economic hardship in such defined area or areas.

“Directional and other official signs and notices” means only official signs and notices, public utility signs, service club and religious notices, public service signs, and directional signs.

“Directional signs” means signs containing directional information deemed to be in the interest of the traveling public, including information about public places owned or operated by state, federal, or local governments or their agencies; publicly or privately owned natural phenomena; historic, cultural, scientific, educational, and religious sites; and areas of natural scenic beauty or areas naturally suited for outdoor recreation.

“Directional signs, displays, and devices in the specific interest of the traveling public” means any directional sign, display, or device which was lawfully erected under state law in force at the time of its erection, which was in existence on May 5, 1976, and which provides directional information about goods and services in the specific interest of the traveling public but does not conform to the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (5) of Code Section 32-6-72 and paragraphs (1) through (3) of Code Section 32-6-73.

“Erect” means to construct, build, raise, assemble, place, affix, attach, create, paint, draw, or in any other way bring into being or establish, but it shall not include any of the foregoing activities when performed as an incident to the change of advertising message or the normal maintenance or repair of a sign structure.

“Illegal sign” means:

A sign for the maintenance of which a permit is required under this part, or any amendment thereof, which sign is being maintained without a permit;

A sign presently being maintained without a required permit even though it could have been permitted under any outdoor advertising control law in effect at the time of its erection;

A sign presently being maintained without a permit, which sign could not have been permitted under the law in effect at the time of its erection even though the sign may meet the requirements of this part for the issuance of a permit;

A sign on which the permit has been revoked pursuant to this part;

A sign on which a nonconforming application for permit was denied and the denial has become final; and

A nonconforming sign for which no permit was sought as required by Code Section 32-6-79.

“Industrial or commercial activity” means those activities commonly or generally recognized as commercial or industrial except that none of the following activities shall be considered commercial or industrial:

Outdoor advertising structures;

Agricultural, forestry, ranching, grazing, farming, and related activities, including but not limited to wayside fresh produce stands;

Transient or temporary activities;

Activities within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right of way which from the main traveled way are not visible and are not recognizable as being commercial or industrial activities;

Activities more than 660 feet from the nearest edge of the right of way;

Activities conducted in a building principally used as a residence; and

Railroad tracks and minor sidings.

“Information center” means an area or site established and maintained at a safety rest area for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the state and providing such other information as the department may consider desirable.

“Interstate system” or “interstate highway” means any road of the state highway system which is a portion of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways located within this state, as officially designated or as may hereafter be so designated by the department and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation pursuant to the provisions of Title 23, Section 103, United States Code, or any limited-access highway as officially designated or as may hereafter be so designated by the department and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation pursuant to the provisions of Title 23, Section 103, United States Code.

“Maintain” means to allow to exist.

“Main traveled way” means the traveled way of a highway on which through traffic is carried; and, in the case of a divided highway, it means the traveled way of each of the separated roadways for traffic traveling in opposite directions. It does not include such facilities as frontage roads, turning roadways, or parking areas.

(11.1)

“Multiple message sign” means a sign, display, or device which changes the message or copy on the sign electronically by movement or rotation of panels or slats.

“Nonconforming sign” means a sign which was lawfully erected but which does not comply with state law or state regulations due to changes in state law or changes in rules and regulations since the date of erection of the sign.

“Official signs and notices” means signs and notices erected and maintained by public officers or public agencies within their territorial or zoning jurisdiction and pursuant to and in accordance with direction or authorization contained in state, federal, or local law for the purpose of carrying out an official duty or responsibility. Historical markers authorized by state law and erected by state or local government agencies or nonprofit historical societies shall be considered official signs.

“Outdoor advertising” or “sign” means any outdoor sign, light, display, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, placard, poster, billboard, or other thing which is designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform, any part of the advertising or information contents of which are visible from any place on the main traveled way of the interstate or primary highway systems.

“Parkland” means any publicly owned land which is designated or used as a public park, recreation area, wildlife or waterfowl refuge, or historic site.

“Primary system” or “primary highway” means the federal-aid primary system in existence on June 1, 1991, and any highway which is not on such system, but which is on the National Highway System, as officially designated or as may hereafter be so designated by the department and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation pursuant to the provisions of Title 23, Section 103, United States Code.

“Private” shall not mean, through the effect of this part, publicly owned property leased to others.

“Public service signs” means signs located on school bus stop shelters, which signs identify the donor, sponsor, or contributor of said shelters and which contain safety slogans or messages which occupy not less than 60 percent of the sign area.

“Public utility signs” means warning signs, informational signs, notices, or markers which are customarily erected and maintained by publicly or privately owned public utilities as essential to their operations.

“Safety rest area” or “rest area” means an area or site established and maintained within or adjacent to the highway right of way, by or under public supervision or control, for the convenience of the traveling public.

“Scenic area” means any area of particular scenic beauty or historical significance, as determined by the state, federal, or local officials having jurisdiction thereof, and includes interests in land which have been acquired for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty.

“Service club and religious notices” means signs or notices, whose erection is authorized by law, relating to religious services or to meetings of nonprofit service clubs or charitable associations, which signs do not exceed eight square feet in area.

“Specific interest of the traveling public” means information regarding places offering lodging, food, motor vehicle fuels and lubricants, motor vehicle service and repair facilities, or any other service or product available to the general public, including, but not limited to, publicly or privately owned natural phenomena; historic, cultural, scientific, educational, or religious sites; and areas of natural scenic beauty or areas naturally suited for outdoor recreation.

“Traveled way” means the portion of a roadway used for the movement of vehicles, exclusive of shoulders.

“Unzoned commercial or industrial areas” means those areas which are not zoned by state law or local ordinance and on which there is located one or more permanent structures devoted to an industrial or commercial activity or on which an industrial or commercial activity is actually conducted, whether or not a permanent structure is located thereon, and the area along the highway extending outward 600 feet from and beyond the edge of the activity in each direction and a corresponding zone directly across a primary highway which is not also a limited-access highway, when the same is not a public park, public playground, public recreational area, public forest, parkland, scenic area, cemetery, primarily residential, or locally zoned. All measurements shall be from the outer edges of the regularly used buildings, parking lots, or storage, processing, or landscaped areas of the commercial or industrial activity and not from the property lines of the activity and shall be along or parallel to the edge of the pavement of the highway.

“Urban area” means an area included within the boundaries of an incorporated municipality having a population of 5,000 or more as determined by the latest available federal census and any area adjacent to such municipality, provided that such adjacent area is included within boundaries presently designated and fixed by the outdoor advertising urban area boundary maps and written records attached thereto on file in the office of the treasurer of the Department of Transportation.

“Visible” means capable of being seen (whether or not legible) without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity.

“Would work a substantial economic hardship” means having the potential to cause a substantial negative economic effect in a defined area or areas, as may be demonstrated by a projected reduction in gross business sales, state and local sales taxes, and employment opportunities within the defined area or areas.

“Zoned commercial or industrial areas” means those areas which are zoned for industrial or commercial activities pursuant to state or local zoning laws or ordinances as part of a comprehensive zoning plan. Strip zoning shall not be considered as a bona fide comprehensive zoning plan. Comprehensive zoning plans for the purposes of outdoor advertising only shall be approved by the board when an application for a permit has been made.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-914, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, §§ 22, 23; Ga. L. 1977, p. 263, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1086, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1052, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 4/SB 160.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

32-6-72.
Designation of outdoor advertising which may be erected or maintained within 660 feet of nearest edge of right of way.

No outdoor advertising shall be erected or maintained within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right of way and visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary highways in this state, except the following:

Directional and other official signs and notices;

Signs advertising the sale or lease of the property upon which they are located;

Signs advertising activities conducted or maintained within 100 feet of the nearest part of the activity as the dimensions of said activity are determined by department regulations, which regulations need not take into consideration the property lines of said activity;

Signs located in areas zoned commercial or industrial, which signs provide information in the specific interest of the traveling public;

Signs located in unzoned commercial or industrial areas, which signs provide information in the specific interest of the traveling public; and

Directional signs, displays, and devices about goods and services in the specific interest of the traveling public located in a defined area or areas approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-915, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1086, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, a comma was deleted between “public” and “located” in paragraph (6).

32-6-73.
Designation of outdoor advertising which may be erected or maintained beyond 660 feet of nearest edge of right of way.

No outdoor advertising shall be erected or maintained beyond 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right of way of the interstate or primary highways in this state outside of urban areas so as to be visible and intended to be read from the main traveled way, except the following:

Directional and other official signs and notices;

Signs advertising the sale or lease of the property upon which they are located;

Signs advertising activities conducted or maintained within 100 feet from the nearest part of the activity as the dimensions of said activity are determined by department regulations, which regulations need not take into consideration the property lines of said activity; and

Directional signs, displays, and devices about goods and services in the specific interest of the traveling public located in a defined area or areas approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-915.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 263, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1086, § 4.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, a comma was deleted between “public” and “located” in paragraph (4).

32-6-74.
Applications for outdoor advertising sign permits generally; fees; renewals; transfer of permits.

Applications for permits authorized by subsections (a) through (d) of Code Section 32-6-79 shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed by the department. The applications shall contain the signature of the applicant and such other information as may be required by the department and shall be verified under oath by the person, firm, or corporation making the application. Permits and renewals thereof shall be issued for and shall be valid only if the sign is erected and maintained in accordance with this part during the 12 month period next following the date of issuance. As to permits for the initial erection of an outdoor advertising sign, one 12 month extension may be granted so long as a written request is submitted to the department at least 30 days prior to expiration along with a fee of $35.00. Any denial of an extension request shall be sent to the applicant before the expiration date and shall state the basis for denial. Multiple extensions shall not be granted as to the same permit, and the applicant shall not be allowed to reapply for the same site until the extension has expired; however, modifications to the application which do not extend the term of the permit shall be allowed. There shall be an initial outdoor advertising permit fee and an annual renewal fee. On and after July 1, 2011, the outdoor advertising application fee shall be $300.00, and the renewal fee for each sign shall be $85.00. The department may adjust future application and renewal fees through the formal rule making process so long as notice of any proposed increase is sent to the House and Senate Transportation Committees at least 30 days prior to final adoption by the department. Such fees shall be limited to amounts sufficient to offset the administrative costs to the department. An annual report on the expenditures and revenues of the department related to the outdoor advertising program shall be sent to the House and Senate Transportation Committees no later than October 31 of each year. Upon receipt of a properly executed application and the appropriate fee for the erection or maintenance of a sign which may be lawfully erected or maintained pursuant to this part, the department shall, within 60 days, issue a permit authorizing the erection or maintenance, or both, of the sign for which application was made except when a person, firm, or corporation is maintaining or allowing the maintenance of an illegal sign as provided for in subsection (f) of Code Section 32-6-79. All outdoor advertising permits and renewals shall expire on the first day of April in the year following issuance. Renewal of such permits shall be made to the department between January 1 and April 1 of each calendar year. Notice of such renewal period shall be mailed to each outdoor advertising permit holder along with an itemized list of all permits maintained by such person or entity in the month of December. In response, each permit holder should clearly indicate any permits not being renewed and return a copy to the department along with payment for all permits being renewed. If a permit holder believes the itemized list is incomplete or inaccurate, such permit holder shall clearly note such discrepancies on the list and return a copy to the department with supporting documentation. The permit holder shall submit the renewal and any suggested corrections within 60 days of the date of the department notice or by April 1, whichever occurs last. If the department fails to receive the renewal before the expiration date, the department shall notify the permit holder by certified mail that the renewal is overdue and shall give the permit holder 45 days from the date of the postmark on such notice to send the department the renewal. If the applicant does not send the permit renewal and fee within 45 days after the postmark date on such notice, the permit shall expire and the sign shall then become an illegal sign. Signs shall become illegal by operation of law after the expiration of the permit followed by notice to the permit holder and a failure to submit for the renewal within 45 days. Any illegal sign may be removed without any administrative proceeding before the department. Vegetation permits or renewals issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-75.3 shall expire on the first day of September in the year following issuance. If a vegetation permit renewal application and fee is not timely submitted and such deficiency is not cured within 45 days of the postmark date of notice via certified mail from the department, the vegetation permit shall be canceled, but the sign shall not be deemed illegal. No permit shall be renewed if the renewal thereof has not been made in accordance with this Code section.

Permits shall be transferable. An application to have the permit specified in subsection (a) of this Code section transferred shall be made within 30 days of the change in ownership of the sign; shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed by the department; shall contain the signature of the applicant and such other information as may be required by the department; and shall be verified under oath by the person, firm, or corporation making application for transfer. Failure to comply in a timely and proper manner with this subsection shall be grounds for revocation of the permit.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 10; Code 1933, § 95A-922, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 32; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1508, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 6; Ga. L. 2011, p. 601, § 1/HB 179.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 601, § 4/HB 179, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The Department of Transportation shall have 120 days from the effective date to promulgate any forms or policies necessary to implement this Act.
Those applications submitted before any necessary forms and policies are in place shall be processed in accordance with the regulations in place prior to the effective date.
Those holding vegetation maintenance permits or renewals issued at any time prior to the promulgation of the necessary forms and policies shall, upon written request to the department, be able to trim or remove vegetation in accordance with the terms of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 91 (2011).

For article, “Highways, Bridges, and Ferries:
Regulation of Maintenance and Use of Public Roads Generally,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 91 (2011).

32-6-75.
Restrictions on outdoor advertising authorized by Code Sections 32-6-72 and 32-6-73; multiple message signs on interstate system, primary highways, and other highways.

No sign authorized by paragraphs (4) through (6) of Code Section 32-6-72 and paragraph (4) of Code Section 32-6-73 shall be erected or maintained which:

Advertises an activity that is illegal under Georgia or federal laws or regulations in effect at the location of such sign or at the location of such activity;

Is obsolete;

Is not structurally safe, clean, and in good repair;

Is not securely affixed to a substantial structure which is permanently attached to the ground;

Is attached to, drawn, or painted upon trees, rocks, or other natural features;

Moves or has any moving or animated parts, except as expressly allowed under subsection (c) of this Code section;

Emits or utilizes in any manner any sound capable of being detected on the main traveled way by a person with normal hearing;

If illuminated, contains, includes, or is illuminated by any flashing, intermittent, or moving light or lights except those giving public service information such as time, date, temperature, weather, or other similar information except as expressly permitted under subsection (c) of this Code section. The illumination of multiple message signs is not illumination by flashing, intermittent, or moving light or lights, except that no multiple message sign may include any illumination which is flashing, intermittent, or moving when the sign is in a fixed position;

If illuminated, is not effectively shielded so as to prevent beams or rays of light from being directed at any portion of the traveled way, which beams or rays are of such intensity or brilliance as to cause glare or to impair the vision of the driver of any motor vehicle or which otherwise interfere with the operation of a motor vehicle;

If illuminated, is illuminated so that it obscures or interferes with the effectiveness of an official traffic sign, device, or signal;

Contains an area, to be measured by the smallest square, rectangle, triangle, circle, or combination thereof, which encompasses the entire sign, in excess of 1,200 square feet or exceeding 30 feet in height or 60 feet in length, inclusive of any border and trim but excluding the base, apron, supports, and other structural members; provided, however, that, in counties having a population greater than 500,000 according to the United States decennial census for 1970 or any such future census, the maximum size of 1,200 square feet, the maximum height of 30 feet, and the maximum length of 60 feet may be exceeded, but in no event shall any such sign exceed 3,000 square feet; provided, further, that no such oversize signs shall be erected after July 1, 1973;

Contains more than two faces visible from the same direction on the main traveled way; provided, however, that after July 1, 2006, no sign shall be erected that contains more than one face vertically stacked visible from the same direction on the main traveled way. Double-faced, back-to-back, and V-type constructed signs shall, for the purpose of determining compliance with size and spacing limitations, be considered as one sign;

Is in an area not zoned for commercial or industrial activity and within 300 feet of a residence without the written consent of the owner;

Is within 500 feet in any direction of a public park, public playground, public recreation area, public forest, scenic area, or cemetery; provided, however, that such sign may be located within 500 feet of a public park, public playground, public recreation area, public forest, scenic area, or cemetery when the sign is separated by buildings or other obstructions so that the sign located within the 500 foot zone is not visible from the public park, public playground, public recreation area, public forest, scenic area, or cemetery;

Is located so as to obscure or otherwise interfere with the effectiveness of an official traffic sign, signal, or device;

Is located so as to obscure or otherwise interfere with a motor vehicle operator’s view of approaching, merging, or intersecting traffic;

Is located adjacent to an interstate highway and which is within 500 feet of another sign on the same side of the highway; provided, however, that such sign may be located within 500 feet of another sign when the signs are separated by buildings or other obstructions so that only one sign face located within the 500 foot zone is visible from the interstate highway at any time;

Is located outside of the corporate limits of a municipality and adjacent to an interstate highway within 500 feet of an interchange, intersection at grade, or safety rest area. The foregoing 500 foot zone shall be measured along the interstate highway from the point at which the pavement commences or ceases to widen at exits from or entrances to the main traveled way. In circumstances where both the exit and entrance ramps on one side of an interchange constitute continuous lanes of travel to the exit and entrance ramps of the adjacent interchange, this side of the interchange shall be treated as if no ramps exist and the foregoing 500 foot zone on this side of the interchange shall be measured from the survey centerline of the main traveled way and crossroad forming the interchange or intersecting road. In all circumstances where this definition conflicts with any agreement with the United States secretary of transportation pursuant to Code Section 32-6-87, said agreement shall be deemed to control for purposes of this Code section;

Is located outside of the corporate limits of a municipality and adjacent to a highway on the primary system and which is within 300 feet of another sign on the same side of the highway; provided, however, that such sign may be located within 300 feet of another sign when the signs are separated by buildings or other obstructions so that only one sign face located within the 300 foot zone is visible from the primary system highway at any one time;

Is located within the corporate limits of a municipality and adjacent to a highway on the primary system and which is within 100 feet of another sign on the same side of the highway; provided, however, that such sign may be located within 100 feet of another sign when the signs are separated by buildings or other obstructions so that only one sign face located within the 100 foot zone is visible from the primary system highway at any one time; or

Depicts any material which is obscene as such term is defined in Code Section 16-12-80.

Reserved.

Multiple message signs shall be permitted on the interstate system, primary highways, and other highways under the following conditions:

Each multiple message sign shall remain fixed for at least ten seconds;

When a message is changed mechanically, it shall be accomplished in three seconds or less;

No such multiple message sign shall be placed within 5,000 feet of another multiple message sign on the same side of the highway;

Any such sign shall contain a default design that will freeze the sign in one position if a malfunction occurs;

Any maximum size limitations shall apply independently to each side of a multiple message sign; and

Nonmechanical electronic multiple message signs that are otherwise in compliance with this subsection and are illuminated entirely by the use of light emitting diodes, back lighting, or any other light source shall be permitted under the following circumstances:

Each transitional change occurs within two seconds;

If the department finds an electronic sign or any display or effect thereon to cause glare or to impair the vision of the driver of any motor vehicle or to otherwise interfere with the safe operation of a motor vehicle, then, upon the department’s request, the owner of the sign shall promptly and within not more than 48 hours reduce the intensity of the sign to a level acceptable to the department; and

The owner of any existing or nonconforming electronic sign shall have until October 31, 2006, to bring the electronic sign in compliance with this subparagraph and to request a permit from the department.

If a multiple message sign on a primary highway or other highway is in violation of any of the above conditions, its permit shall be revoked and the sign shall be removed. During the appeal of any violations of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the sign shall remain fixed until the matter is resolved. The commissioner may allow the continued operation of a multiple message sign during part or all of the appeals process.

After April 15, 1996, all persons, firms, or corporations who have signs that were illegal signs under previous law, but which are legal signs under the provisions of this subsection, shall have a one-year period during which time they shall be required to file an application for a permit issued by the department. Applications for such permits shall be made upon forms prescribed and provided by the department and shall contain the signature of the applicant and such other information as may be required by the department rules and regulations. The department shall have a period of 60 days from the date such an application is received to process it. If, at the end of this 60 day period, the department has failed to approve or deny an application in proper form, it shall be conclusively presumed for all purposes that the sign can be permitted and the department must issue the permit within a reasonable time. Should the department deny the application, the applicant may seek relief in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” In cases where the applicant fails to exhaust the procedures prescribed by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the department’s denial of the permit request will be final and the sign shall then become an illegal sign as defined by paragraph (6) of Code Section 32-6-71 and shall be subject to removal under the terms of this part. If the owner of the sign fails to apply properly for a permit and it is conclusively presumed that the sign has been abandoned, the sign shall remain an illegal sign as defined by paragraph (6) of Code Section 32-6-71 and the sign shall be subject to removal under the terms of this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 423, §§ 3, 4, 6; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 4; Code 1933, § 95A-916, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, §§ 25, 26, 27, 28, 30; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 32; Ga. L. 1996, p. 831, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1052, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1132, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 691, §§ 3-6/HB 1097; Ga. L. 2019, p. 260, § 1/SB 79.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “mechanical” preceding “multiple message” in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(8) and in the middle of subparagraph (c)(1)(C).

Cross references.

False advertising, §

10-1-420

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a comma was inserted following “flashing” in paragraph (a)(8).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, subsection (b), which was added by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1052, § 3, was redesignated as subsection (c) in view of the fact that Ga. L. 1996, p. 831 also enacted a subsection (b). As a result, the reference in paragraph (a)(6) to “subsection (b)” was changed to be a reference to “subsection (c)”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “April 15, 1996” was substituted for “the effective date of this subsection” in the first sentence of paragraph (c)(3).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “until October 31, 2006,” was substituted for “180 days from the effective date of this subparagraph” in division (c)(1)(F)(iii).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 691, § 7/HB 1097, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 highways, bridges, and ferries legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 180 (1996).

For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).